Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-711
Application to construct line or increase voltage; notice; hearing.

Upon application being filed pursuant to section 75-710, the commission shall notify all parties who own or operate electrical or communication lines or railroad signal lines and who are likely to be affected by the construction of the electrical lines to appear at a public hearing at a time and place to be fixed by the commission for hearing of the application. Any such party may appear as provided in the rules of procedure of the commission. The commission shall take into consideration the prior occupancy of the space by existing lines.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 11, p. 1424;

Laws 1981, LB 485, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 123.